North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Part 2. Ballots and Voting Systems.

§ 163-165.1.
Scope and general rules.

Scope. — This Article shall apply to all elections in this State.

Requirements of Official Ballots in Voting. — In any election conducted under this Article:

All voting shall be by official ballot.

Only votes cast on an official ballot shall be counted.

Compliance With This Article. — All ballots shall comply with the provisions of this Article.

Other Uses Prohibited. — An official ballot shall not be used for any purpose not authorized by this Article.

Voted ballots and paper and electronic records of individual voted ballots shall be treated as confidential, and no person other than elections officials performing their duties may have access to voted ballots or paper or electronic records of individual
voted ballots except by court order or order of the appropriate board of elections as part of the resolution of an election protest or investigation of an alleged election irregularity or violation. Voted ballots and paper and
electronic records of individual voted ballots shall not be disclosed to members of the public in such a way as to disclose how a particular voter voted, unless a court orders otherwise. Any person who has access to an official
voted ballot or record and knowingly discloses in violation of this section how an individual has voted that ballot is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2002-159, s. 55(o); 2005-323, s. 1(f); 2007-391, s. 9(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.2.
Sample ballots.

County Board to Produce and Distribute Sample Ballots. — The county board of elections shall produce sample ballots, in all the necessary ballot styles of the official ballot, for every election to be held in the county. The sample ballots shall be given
an appearance that clearly distinguishes them from official ballots. The county board shall distribute sample ballots to the chief judge of every precinct in which the election is to be conducted. The chief judge shall post a sample
ballot in the voting place and may use it for instructional purposes. The county board of elections may use the sample ballot for other informational purposes.

Document Resembling an Official Ballot to Contain Disclaimer. — No person other than a board of elections shall produce or disseminate a document substantially resembling an official ballot unless the document contains on its face a prominent statement
that the document was not produced by a board of elections and is not an official ballot.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.3.
Responsibilities for preparing official ballots.

State Board Responsibilities. — The State Board of Elections shall certify the official ballots and voter instructions to be used in every election that is subject to this Article. In conducting its certification, the State Board shall adhere to the
following:

No later than January 31 of every calendar year, the State Board shall establish a schedule for the certification of all official ballots and instructions during that year. The schedule shall include a time for county boards of elections to submit their
official ballots and instructions to the State Board for certification and times for the State Board to complete the certification.

The State Board of Elections shall compose model ballot instructions, which county boards of elections may amend subject to approval by the State Board as part of the certification process. The State Board of Elections may permit a county board of elections
to place instructions elsewhere than on the official ballot itself, where placing them on the official ballot would be impractical.

With regard only to multicounty ballot items on the official ballot, the State Board shall certify the accuracy of the content on the official ballot.

With regard to the entire official ballot, the State Board shall certify that the content and arrangement of the official ballot are in substantial compliance with the provisions of this Article and standards adopted by the State Board.

The State Board shall proofread the official ballot of every county, if practical, prior to final production.

The State Board is not required to certify or review every official ballot style in the county but may require county boards to submit and may review a composite official ballot showing races that will appear in every district in the county.The State
Board shall be responsible for oversight of all ballot coding. In order to produce the data necessary for equipment programming, each county shall either contract with a qualified vendor certified by the State Board or
be certified by the State Board to produce the data.

County Board Responsibilities. — Each county board of elections shall prepare and produce official ballots for all elections in that county. The county board of elections shall submit the format of each official ballot and set of instructions to the
State Board of Elections for review and certification in accordance with the schedule established by the State Board. The county board of elections shall follow the directions of the State Board in placing candidates, referenda,
and other material on official ballots and in placing instructions.

Late Changes in Ballots. — The State Board shall promulgate rules for late changes in ballots. The rules shall provide for the reprinting, where practical, of official ballots as a result of replacement candidates to fill vacancies in accordance with

G.S. 163-114

or other late changes. If an official ballot is not reprinted, a vote for a candidate who has been replaced in accordance with

G.S. 163-114

will count for the replacement candidate.

Special Ballots. — The State Board of Elections, with the approval of a county board of elections, may produce special official ballots, such as those for disabled voters, where production by the State Board would be more practical than production by
the county board.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2007-391, s. 24(a); 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2009-541, s. 18(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.4.
Standards for official ballots.

The State Board of Elections shall ensure that official ballots throughout the State have all the following characteristics:

Are readily understandable by voters.

Present all candidates and questions in a fair and nondiscriminatory manner.

Allow every voter to cast a vote in every ballot item without difficulty.

Facilitate an accurate vote count.

Are uniform in content and format, subject to varied presentations required or made desirable by different voting systems.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2013-381, s. 29.1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.4A.
Punch-card ballots and lever machines.

No ballot may be used in any referendum, primary, or other election as an official ballot if it requires the voter to punch out a hole with a stylus or other tool.

No lever machine voting system may be used in any referendum, primary, or other election as a means of voting the official ballot. A “lever machine voting system” is a voting system on which the voter casts a vote by pressing a lever and the vote is mechanically
recorded by the machine.

In any counties that used punch-card ballots as official ballots or lever machines in the election of November 2000, and in any municipalities located in those counties, this section becomes effective January 1, 2006. It is the intent of the General Assembly
that any county that uses county funds to replace voting equipment to satisfy this section shall be given priority in appropriations to counties for voting equipment.

History.
2001-310, ss. 1, 3; 2003-226, s. 12; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.4B.
Butterfly ballots.

No butterfly ballot may be used as an official ballot in any referendum, primary, or other election. The term “butterfly ballot” means a ballot having more than one column listing ballot choices that share a common column for designating those choices.

History.
2001-310, ss. 2, 3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.4C.
Prohibited voting systems.

A voting system that does not use or produce a ballot shall not be used in any referendum, primary, or other election as a means of voting or counting an official ballot.

History.
2015-103, s. 5(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.5.
Contents of official ballots.

Except as provided in this section, each official ballot shall contain all the following elements:

The heading prescribed by the State Board. The heading shall include the term “Official Ballot”.

The title of each office to be voted on and the number of votes allowed in each ballot item.

The names of the candidates as they appear on their notice of candidacy filed pursuant to

G.S. 163-106

, 163-106.1, 163-106.2, 163-106.3, 163-106.4, 163-106.5, and 163-106.6, or on petition forms filed in accordance with

G.S. 163-122

. No title, appendage, or appellation indicating rank, status, or position shall be printed on the official ballot in connection with the candidate’s name. Candidates, however, may use the title Mr., Mrs.,
Miss, or Ms. Nicknames shall be permitted on an official ballot if used in the notice of candidacy or qualifying petition, but the nickname shall appear according to standards adopted by the State Board of Elections. Those
standards shall allow the presentation of legitimate nicknames in ways that do not mislead the voter or unduly advertise the candidacy. In the case of candidates for presidential elector, the official ballot shall not contain
the names of the candidates for elector but instead shall contain the nominees for President and Vice President which the candidates for elector represent. The State Board of Elections shall establish a review procedure
that local boards of elections shall follow to ensure that candidates’ names appear on the official ballot in accordance with this subdivision.

Party designations in partisan ballot items.

A means by which the voter may cast write-in votes, as provided in

G.S. 163-123

. No space for write-ins is required unless a write-in candidate has qualified under

G.S. 163-123

or unless the ballot item is exempt from G.S. 163-123.

Instructions to voters, unless the State Board of Elections allows instructions to be placed elsewhere than on the official ballot.

The printed title and facsimile signature of the chair of the county board of elections.

The designation of vacancy sought, for any vacancy for the office of Justice or judge of the courts. The designation shall not be the name or names of any incumbent or other individual but shall be designated as determined by the State Board.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an official ballot created and printed by use of a voting system in the voting enclosure shall be counted if all of the following apply:

Each of the following are printed on that official ballot:

The date of the election.

The precinct name or a unique identification code associated with that ballot style.

The choices made by the voter for all ballot items in which the voter cast a vote.

The electronic display of the voting system seen by the voter contains all of the information required by subsection (a) of this section.

The voter is capable of reviewing the printed official ballot, and voiding that ballot, prior to casting that voter’s ballot.

The voter’s choices in and on the electronic display are removed prior to the next voter using that voting equipment.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2003-209, s. 1; 2007-391, s. 10; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2015-103, s. 4(b); 2015-292, s. 1; 2016-125, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 21(g); 2017-3, s. 12; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-121, s. 4(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Elections for Judicial Offices 2018.

Session Laws 2018-13, s. 2(a)-(d), as amended by 2018-130, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 2, 3, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that both chambers of the General Assembly have carefully examined judicial redistricting and the forms of judicial selection
with multiple committees considering various proposals of selection and new judicial district maps. The General Assembly finds that, to allow for more time to thoughtfully consider these changes, the General Assembly enacted S.L. 2017-214,
the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, which, among other items, provided for a one-time cancellation of partisan primaries for the offices of district court judge, superior court judge, judges of the Court of Appeals, and Supreme Court
justices for the 2018 election cycle. The General Assembly finds that all elections for judges in 2018 were to be treated uniformly under S.L. 2017-214, the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, while those changes were considered.

“The General Assembly notes that election to these offices will be held under a plurality election system, with candidates running under a political party label on the ballot, without having gone through a party primary. The General Assembly finds that
ballot language above the sections of 2018 general election ballots regarding these impacted offices setting forth the listed party affiliation of a candidate at least 90 days prior to the time of filing, consistent with G.S. 163A-973,
would aid voters’ understanding of the 2018 judicial races.

“(b) For the 2018 general election, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall, notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1114(b)(2), list the following judicial offices at the end of all partisan offices listed on the general election ballot:

“(1) Justices of the Supreme Court.

“(2) Judges of the Court of Appeals.

“(3) Judges of the superior courts.

“(4) Judges of the district courts.

“(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1112, immediately prior to the placement of the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section on the ballot, the following information shall be printed:

“No primaries for judicial office were held in 2018. The party information by each of the following candidates’ names is shown only if the candidates’ party affiliation or unaffiliated status is the same as on their voter registration at the time they
filed to run for office and 90 days prior to that filing.

“(d) Except as provided in this section, ballot order for the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section shall be as provided in Section 4(j) of S.L. 2017-214.”

§ 163-165.5A.

Expired pursuant to Session Laws 2001-288, s. 3, effective January 1, 2012.

§ 163-165.5B.
Ballots may be combined.

Notwithstanding any other statute or local act, a county board of elections, with the approval of the State Board of Elections, may combine ballot items on the same official ballot.

History.
2007-391, s. 7; 2008-187, s. 33(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-165.6.
Arrangement of official ballots.

Order of Precedence Generally. — Candidate ballot items shall be arranged on the official ballot before referenda.

Order of Precedence for Candidate Ballot Items. — The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules prescribing the order of offices to be voted on the official ballot. Those rules shall adhere to the following guidelines:

Federal offices shall be listed before State and local offices. Member of the United States House of Representatives shall be listed immediately after United States Senator.

State and local offices shall be listed according to the size of the electorate.

Partisan offices, regardless of the size of the constituency, shall be listed before nonpartisan offices.

When offices are in the same class, they shall be listed in alphabetical order by office name, or in numerical or alphabetical order by district name. Governor and Lieutenant Governor, in that order, shall be listed before other Council of State offices.
The Supreme Court shall be listed before the Court of Appeals. Judicial offices and district attorney shall be listed, in that order, after other offices in the same class. Mayor shall be listed before other citywide offices.
Chair of a board, where elected separately, shall be listed before other board seats having the same electorate. Chief Justice shall be listed before Associate Justices.

Ballot items for full terms of an office shall be listed before ballot items for partial terms of the same office.

Ballot items for retention elections held under Article 1A of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes shall be grouped with like State offices, but shall be listed after offices for which an election is conducted under Article 25 of this Chapter.

Order of Candidates on Official Ballots. — The order in which candidates shall appear on official ballots in any election ballot item shall be either alphabetical order or reverse alphabetical order by the last name of the candidate, which order shall
be determined each election by drawing at the State Board after the closing of the filing period for all offices on the ballot.

, (e) Repealed by Session Laws 2018-99, s. 1, effective June 26, 2018, and applciable to elections held on or after that date. (f) No Straight-Party Voting. — Each official ballot shall not contain any place that allows a voter with one mark to vote for
the candidates of a party for more than one office.

(g) Write-In Voting. — Each official ballot shall be so arranged so that voters may cast write-in votes for candidates except where prohibited by

G.S. 163-123

or other statutes governing write-in votes. Instructions for general election ballots shall clearly advise voters of the rules of this subsection and of the statutes governing write-in voting.

(h) Order of Precedence for Referenda. — Without referencing a numerical order or other reference of order by category or within a category, the referendum questions to be voted on shall be arranged on the official ballot in the following order:

Proposed amendments to the North Carolina Constitution, in the chronological order in which the proposals were approved by the General Assembly. Proposed amendments shall be designated by only the phrase “Constitutional Amendment” prior to setting forth
the referendum question.

Other referenda to be voted on by all voters in the State, in the chronological order in which the proposals were approved by the General Assembly.

Referenda to be voted on by fewer than all the voters in the State, in the chronological order of the acts by which the referenda were properly authorized.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2002-158, s. 14; 2013-381, ss. 31.1, 32.1; 2014-111, s. 2; 2015-66, s. 4; 2016-109, ss. 3, 4(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, s. 3.6; 2018-99, s. 1; 2018-131, 1st Ex. Sess., s. 1(a); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

Elections for Judicial Offices 2018.

Session Laws 2018-13, s. 2(a)-(d), as amended by 2018-130, 1st Ex. Sess., ss. 2, 3, provides: “(a) The General Assembly finds that both chambers of the General Assembly have carefully examined judicial redistricting and the forms of judicial selection
with multiple committees considering various proposals of selection and new judicial district maps. The General Assembly finds that, to allow for more time to thoughtfully consider these changes, the General Assembly enacted S.L. 2017-214,
the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, which, among other items, provided for a one-time cancellation of partisan primaries for the offices of district court judge, superior court judge, judges of the Court of Appeals, and Supreme Court
justices for the 2018 election cycle. The General Assembly finds that all elections for judges in 2018 were to be treated uniformly under S.L. 2017-214, the Electoral Freedom Act of 2017, while those changes were considered.

“The General Assembly notes that election to these offices will be held under a plurality election system, with candidates running under a political party label on the ballot, without having gone through a party primary. The General Assembly finds that
ballot language above the sections of 2018 general election ballots regarding these impacted offices setting forth the listed party affiliation of a candidate at least 90 days prior to the time of filing, consistent with G.S. 163A-973,
would aid voters’ understanding of the 2018 judicial races.

“(b) For the 2018 general election, the State Board of Elections and Ethics Enforcement shall, notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1114(b)(2), list the following judicial offices at the end of all partisan offices listed on the general election ballot:

“(1) Justices of the Supreme Court.

“(2) Judges of the Court of Appeals.

“(3) Judges of the superior courts.

“(4) Judges of the district courts.

“(c) Notwithstanding G.S. 163A-1112, immediately prior to the placement of the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section on the ballot, the following information shall be printed:

“No primaries for judicial office were held in 2018. The party information by each of the following candidates’ names is shown only if the candidates’ party affiliation or unaffiliated status is the same as on their voter registration at the time they
filed to run for office and 90 days prior to that filing.

“(d) Except as provided in this section, ballot order for the judicial offices listed in subsection (b) of this section shall be as provided in Section 4(j) of S.L. 2017-214.”

§ 163-165.7.
Voting systems: powers and duties of State Board.

Only voting systems that have been certified by the State Board of Elections in accordance with the procedures set forth by the State Board of Elections and subject to the standards set forth in this section and that have not been subsequently decertified
shall be permitted for use in elections in this State. Those certified voting systems shall be valid in any election held in the State or in any county, municipality, or other electoral district in the State. Subject to all other
applicable rules adopted by the State Board of Elections and, with respect to federal elections, subject to all applicable federal regulations governing voting systems, paper ballots marked by the voter and counted by hand shall
be deemed a certified voting system. The State Board of Elections shall certify optical scan voting systems, optical scan with ballot markers voting systems, and direct record electronic voting systems if any of those systems meet
all applicable requirements of federal and State law. The State Board may certify voting systems only if they meet the requirements set forth in this section and only if they generate a paper ballot which provides a backup means
of counting the vote that the voter casts. Those voting systems may include optical scan and direct record electronic (DRE) voting systems that produce a paper ballot. Among other requirements as set by the State Board of Elections,
the certification requirements shall require at least all of the following elements:

That the vendor post a performance bond or letter of credit to cover damages resulting from defects in the voting system, expenses associated with State or federal decertification of the voting system, and to protect against the vendor’s insolvency or
financial inability to make State or federally mandated modifications or updates to the voting system. Damages may include, among other items, any costs of conducting a new county or statewide election attributable to those
defects. The bond or letter of credit shall be maintained in the amount determined by the State Board as sufficient for the cost of a new statewide election or in the amount of ten million dollars ($10,000,000), whichever
is greater.

That the voting system comply with all federal requirements for voting systems.

That the voting system must have the capacity to include in voting district returns the votes cast by voters outside of the precinct associated with that voter’s voter registration.

With respect to electronic voting systems, that the voting system generate a paper ballot of each individual vote cast, which paper ballot shall be maintained in a secure fashion and shall serve as a backup record for purposes of any hand-to-eye count,
hand-to-eye recount, or other audit. Electronic systems that employ optical scan technology to count paper ballots shall be deemed to satisfy this requirement.

With respect to DRE voting systems, that the paper ballot generated by the system be viewable by the voter before the vote is cast electronically, and that the system permit the voter to correct any discrepancy between the electronic vote and the paper
ballot before the vote is cast.

With respect to all voting systems using electronic means, that the vendor provide access to all of any information required to be placed in escrow by a vendor pursuant to

G.S. 163-165.9

A for review and examination by the State Board of Elections; the Department of Information Technology; the State chairs of each political party recognized under

G.S. 163-96

; the purchasing county; and designees as provided in subdivision (9) of subsection (f) of this section.

That the vendor must quote a statewide uniform price for each unit of the equipment.

That the vendor must separately agree with the purchasing county that if it is granted a contract to provide software for an electronic voting system but fails to debug, modify, repair, or update the software as agreed or in the event of the vendor having
bankruptcy filed for or against it, the source code described in

G.S. 163-165.9

A(a) shall be turned over to the purchasing county by the escrow agent chosen under G.S. 163-165.9A(a)(1) for the purposes of continuing use of the software for the period of the contract and for permitting
access to the persons described in subdivision (6) of this subsection for the purpose of reviewing the source code.As part of the certification requirements, the State Board of Elections shall address the mandatory terms
of the contract for the purchase of the voting system and the maintenance and training related to that voting system.

Federal Assistance. — The State Board may use guidelines, information, testing reports, certification, decertification, recertification, and any relevant data produced by the Election Assistance Commission, its Standards Board, its Board of Advisors,
or the Technical Guidelines Development Committee as established in Title II of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 with regard to any action or investigation the State Board may take concerning a voting system. The State Board may
use, for the purposes of voting system certification, laboratories accredited by the Election Assistance Commission under the provisions of section 231(2) of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

Only electronic poll books or ballot duplication systems that have been certified by the State Board in accordance with procedures and subject to standards adopted by the State Board, or which have been developed or maintained by the State Board, shall
be permitted for use in elections in this State. Among other requirements as set by the State Board, the certification requirements shall require that a vendor meet at least all of the following elements:

That the vendor post a bond or letter of credit to cover damages resulting from defects in the electronic poll book or ballot duplication system. Damages may include, among other items, any costs of conducting a new election attributable to those defects.

That the vendor provide access to all of any information required to be placed in escrow by a vendor pursuant to

G.S. 163-165.9

A for review and examination by the State Board, the Department of Information Technology, the State chairs of each political party recognized under

G.S. 163-90

, the purchasing county, and designees as provided in subdivision (9) of subsection (f) of this section.

That the vendor must quote a statewide uniform price for each unit of the equipment.

That the vendor must separately agree with the purchasing county that if it is granted a contract to provide software for an electronic poll books or ballot duplication system but fails to debug, modify, repair, or update the software as agreed or, in
the event of the vendor having bankruptcy filed for or against it, the source code described in

G.S. 163-165.9

A(a) shall be turned over to the purchasing county by the escrow agent chosen under G.S. 163-165.9A(a)(1) for the purposes of continuing use of the software for the period of the contract and for permitting
access to the persons described in subdivision (2) of this subsection for the purpose of reviewing the source code.

The State Board may also, upon notice and hearing, decertify types, makes, and models of voting systems. Upon decertifying a type, make, or model of voting system, the State Board shall determine the process by which the decertified system is discontinued
in any county. A county may appeal a decision by the State Board concerning the process by which the decertified system is discontinued in that county to the Superior Court of Wake County. The county has 30 days from the time it
receives notice of the State Board’s decision on the process by which the decertified system is discontinued in that county to make that appeal.

Prior to certifying a voting system, the State Board of Elections shall review, or designate an independent expert to review, all source code made available by the vendor pursuant to this section and certify only those voting systems compliant with State
and federal law. At a minimum, the State Board’s review shall include a review of security, application vulnerability, application code, wireless security, security policy and processes, security/privacy program management, technology
infrastructure and security controls, security organization and governance, and operational effectiveness, as applicable to that voting system. Any portion of the report containing specific information related to any trade secret
as designated pursuant to

G.S. 132-1.2

shall be confidential and shall be accessed only under the rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (9) of subsection (f) of this section. The State Board may hear and discuss the report of any such review under G.S.
143-318.11(a)(1).

Subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the State Board of Elections shall prescribe rules for the adoption, handling, operation, and honest use of certified voting systems, including all of the following:

Procedures for county boards of elections to utilize when recommending the purchase of a certified voting system for use in that county.

Form of official ballot labels to be used on voting systems.

Operation and manner of voting on voting systems.

Instruction of precinct officials in the use of voting systems.

Instruction of voters in the use of voting systems.

Assistance to voters using voting systems.

Duties of custodians of voting systems.

Examination and testing of voting systems in a public forum in the county before and after use in an election.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 132-1.2

, procedures for the review and examination of any information placed in escrow by a vendor pursuant to

G.S. 163-165.9

A by only the following persons:

State Board of Elections.

Department of Information Technology.

The State chairs of each political party recognized under

G.S. 163-96

.

The purchasing county Each person listed in sub-subdivisions a. through d. of this subdivision may designate up to three persons as that person’s agents to review and examine the information. No person shall designate under this subdivision a business
competitor of the vendor whose proprietary information is being reviewed and examined. For purposes of this review and examination, any designees under this subdivision and the State party chairs shall be treated
as public officials under

G.S. 132-2

.

With respect to electronic voting systems, procedures to maintain the integrity of both the electronic vote count and the paper ballot. Those procedures shall at a minimum include procedures to protect against the alteration of the paper ballot after
a machine vote has been recorded and procedures to prevent removal by the voter from the voting enclosure of any individually voted paper ballot or of any other device or item whose removal from the voting enclosure could
permit compromise of the integrity of either the machine count or the paper ballot.

Compliance with section 301 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002.

The State Board of Elections shall facilitate training and support of the voting systems utilized by the counties. The training may be conducted through the use of videoconferencing or other technology.

Neither certification of electronic poll books, ballot duplication systems, or voting systems under this section shall constitute a license under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

The State Board in writing may decertify or otherwise halt the use of electronic poll books in North Carolina. Any such action is appealable only to the Superior Court of Wake County.

No voting system used in any election in this State shall be connected to a network, and any feature allowing connection to a network shall be disabled. Prohibited network connections include the Internet, intranet, fax, telephone line, networks established
via modem, or any other wired or wireless connection.

History.
2001-460, s. 3; 2003-226, s. 11; 2005-323, s. 1(a)-(d); 2006-264, s. 76(a); 2007-391, s. 6(d); 2008-187, s. 33(b); 2009-541, s. 19; 2013-381, s. 30.3; 2015-103, ss. 6(b), 10, 11(a); 2015-241, s. 7A.4(gg); 2016-109, s. 9(b);
2017-6, s. 3; 2018-13, ss. 3.6A, 3.7(a), 3.8(a), 3.11(b); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 4.5(f).

Instant Runoff Voting Pilot Program

Session Laws 2006-192, s. 1(a) and (b), provides: “(a) The State Board of Elections shall select local jurisdictions in which to conduct a pilot program during the 2007 and 2008 elections for local offices using instant runoff voting. The State Board
shall select:

“(1) Up to 10 cities for the 2007 elections.

“(2) Up to 10 counties for the 2008 elections.

“In selecting those local jurisdictions, the State Board shall seek diversity of population size, regional location, and demographic composition. The pilot shall be conducted only with the concurrence of the county board of elections that conducts elections
for the local jurisdiction. If a city is selected that has voters in more than one county, the concurrence of all the county boards of elections that conduct that city’s elections is required. The pilot program shall consist of using
instant runoff voting as the method for determining the winner or winners of a partisan primary or a nonpartisan election that normally uses nonpartisan election and runoff or nonpartisan primary and election. Instant runoff voting
may also be used to determine results in an election where nonpartisan plurality elections are normally used, but only if the governing board of the local jurisdiction concurs.

“As used in this section, ‘instant runoff voting’ means a system in which voters rank up to three of the candidates by order of preference, first, second, or third. If the candidate with the most first-choice votes receives the threshold of victory of
the first-choice votes, that candidate wins. If no candidate receives the threshold of victory of first-choice votes, the two candidates with the greatest number of first-choice votes advance to a second round of counting. In this
round, each ballot counts as a vote for whichever of the two final candidates is ranked highest by the voter. The candidate with the most votes in the second round wins the election.

“The threshold of victory of first-choice votes for a partisan primary shall be forty percent (40%) plus one vote. The threshold of victory for a nonpartisan election and runoff or nonpartisan primary and election shall be a majority of the vote. The
threshold of victory in a contest that normally uses nonpartisan plurality shall be determined by the State Board with the concurrence of the county board of elections and the local governing board.

“If more than one seat is to be filled in the same race, the voter votes the same way as if one seat were to be filled. The counting is the same as when one seat is to be filled, with one or two rounds as needed, except that counting is done separately
for each seat to be filled. The first counting results in the first winner. Then the second count proceeds without the name of the first winner. This process results in the second winner. For each additional seat to be filled, an additional
count is done without the names of the candidates who have already won.

“Other details of instant runoff voting are as described in House Bill 1024 (First Edition) of the 2005 Regular Session of the General Assembly, with modifications the State Board deems necessary, in primaries and/or elections for city offices, for county
offices, or for both. Those modifications may include giving the voter more than three choices in case of multi-seat contests. The State Board shall not use instant runoff voting in a primary or election for an office unless the entire
electorate for the office uses the same method.

“(b) The State Board of Elections shall closely monitor the pilot program established in this section and report its findings and recommendations to the 2007 General Assembly.”

Session Laws 2008-150, s. 3(a), as amended by Session Laws 2009-541, s. 30(a), provides: “The State Board of Elections is authorized to select elections for offices of local government in which to use instant runoff voting in up to 10 local jurisdictions
in each of the following years: 2009, 2010, and 2011. The selection of jurisdictions and administration of instant runoff voting shall follow the provisions of Section 1(a) of Session Law 2006-192, except that the local governing board
that is the subject of the election must approve participation in the pilot and must hold at least one public hearing on the pilot before approving it, with notice of the hearing published at least 10 days before the hearing. The local
governing board also must agree to cooperate with the county board of elections and the Board in the development and implementation of a plan to educate candidates and voters about how to use the runoff voting method. In a multiseat
contest, the Board shall modify the method used for instant runoff voting in single-seat contests to apply its essential principles suitably to that election. In the case of a board of education election where the ‘local governing
board’ must be asked to authorize instant runoff voting because nonpartisan plurality elections are normally used, the ‘local governing board’ is the board of education itself. If instant runoff voting is used in place of the nonpartisan
election and runoff method as described in

G.S. 163-293

, the county board of elections, with the approval of the local governing board, may hold the election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. The State Board of Elections, in consultation with the School
of Government at the University of North Carolina, shall by January 1, 2009, develop for the pilot program authorized in this section goals, standards consistent with general election law, and criteria for implementation and evaluation.
The pilot program shall be conducted according to those goals, standards, and criteria. The term ‘ranked choice voting’ shall have the same meaning as, and may be used as a substitute for, the term ‘instant runoff voting’ in describing
the pilot.”

Session Laws 2009-541, s. 30(b), provides: “This section is effective when it becomes law. The requirement for holding a public hearing applies only to primaries and elections held on and after January 1, 2010, but a local governing board may give notice
of and conduct a public hearing to satisfy the requirement before January 1, 2010.”